Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB178.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 151B.015 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Education and Labor Cabinet is hereby created, which shall constitute a cabinet of the state government
within the meaning of KRS Chapter 12. The cabinet shall consist of a secretary and those administrative
bodies and employees as provided by law.
(2) Subject to KRS Chapter 12, the cabinet shall be composed of the major organizational units listed below, units
listed in KRS 12.020, and other departments, divisions, and sections as are from time to time deemed
necessary for the proper and efficient operation of the cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary, which shall include the Office of Legal Services, the Office of Administrative
Services, the Office of Technology Services, the Office of Policy and Audit, the Office of Legislative
Services, the Office of Communications, and the Office of Kentucky Center for Statistics, as follows:
1. The Office of Legal Services shall:
a. Be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050 and 12.210; and
b. Include the Workplace Standards Legal Division, Workforce Development Legal
Division, and Workers' Claims Legal Division, each of which shall be headed by a general
counsel appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with
KRS 12.050 and 12.210; and
2. The following agencies and entities are attached to the Office of the Secretary for administrative
purposes only:
a. Early Childhood Advisory Council;
b. Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program;
c. Governor's Scholar Program;
d. Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics; and
e. Foundation for Adult Education;
(b) Department of Workers' Claims, which shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the Governor
and confirmed by the Senate in accordance with KRS 342.228. The department shall be divided for
administrative purposes into the Office of Administrative Law Judges, the Division of Claims
Processing, the Division of Security and Compliance, the Division of Workers' Compensation Funds,
and the Division of Specialist and Medical Services. The Office of Administrative Law Judges shall be
headed by a chief administrative law judge appointed in accordance with KRS 342.230. Each division
in the department shall be headed by a director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050. The Workers' Compensation Board shall be attached to the
Department of Workers' Claims for administrative purposes only;
(c) Department of Workplace Standards, which shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.040 and shall be divided for administrative purposes into the
Division of Occupational Safety and Health Compliance, the Division of Occupational Safety and
Health Education and Training, and the Division of Wages and Hours. Each of these divisions shall be
headed by a director appointed by the secretary with the approval of the Governor in accordance with
KRS 12.050;
(d) Office of Unemployment Insurance, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.040;
(e) Kentucky Unemployment Insurance Commission;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(f) Department for Libraries and Archives;
(g) Office of Educational Programs;
(h) Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board;
(i) Department for Disability Determination Services[ Program], which shall include:
1. Division of Operations;
2. Division of Support Services;
3. Division of Specialized Cases; and
4. Division of Case Processing; and
(j) Department of Workforce Development, which shall be headed by a commissioner appointed by the
Governor in accordance with KRS 12.040 who shall report to the secretary. Each office or division in
the department shall be headed by an executive director or division director appointed by the secretary
with the approval of the Governor in accordance with KRS 12.050. The department shall be composed
of the following offices:
1. Career Development Office;
2. Office of Vocational Rehabilitation, which shall include the Division of Program Policy and
Support. The division director shall report to the executive director for the Office of
Vocational Rehabilitation;
3. Office of Industry[Employer] and Apprenticeship Services, which shall include the Division of
Apprenticeship and the Division of Workforce Talent. The division directors shall report to the
executive director of the Office of Industry and Apprenticeship Services;
4. Office of Adult Education;
5. Kentucky Apprenticeship Council, which shall be attached to the department for administrative
purposes only;
6. Division of Technical Assistance; and
7. Office of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(3) The following agencies are attached to the cabinet for administrative purposes only:
(a) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission;
(b) State Labor Relations Board;
(c) Workers' Compensation Funding Commission;
(d) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board;
(e) Kentucky Environmental Education Council;
(f) Kentucky Geographic Education Board;
(g) Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety;
(h) Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education;
(i) Employers' Mutual Insurance Authority;
(j) Workers' Compensation Nominating Committee;
(k) Kentucky Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing;
(l) Kentucky Educational Television;
(m) Kentucky Work Ready Skills Advisory Committee; and
(n) Foundation for Adult Education.
Section 2. KRS 151B.017 is amended to read as follows:

CHAPTER 29 3
(1) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet shall be appointed by the Governor pursuant to KRS 12.255
and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The secretary shall have general supervision and direction over
all activities and functions of the cabinet and its employees shall be responsible for carrying out the programs
and policies of the cabinet. The secretary shall be the chief executive officer of the cabinet and shall have
authority to enter into contracts, subject to the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet, when the contracts are deemed necessary to implement and carry out the programs of the cabinet. The
secretary shall have the authority to require coordination and nonduplication of services provided under the
federal Workforce Investment Act[ of 1998, Pub. L. No. 105-220], as amended. The secretary shall have the
authority to mandate fiscal responsibility and dispute resolution procedures among state organizational units
for services provided under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act[Workforce Investment
Act of 1998].
(2) (a) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet, and the secretary's designated representatives, in the
discharge of the duties of the secretary may:
1. Administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, certify official acts, and issue subpoenas to
compel the attendance of witnesses and parties and the production of books, papers,
correspondence, memoranda, and other records considered necessary and relevant to the matter
under investigation;
2. Administer oaths;
3. Examine witnesses under oath;
4. Take verification of proof or written instruments; and
5. Take testimony, depositions, and affidavits to carry out any law over which the cabinet has
jurisdiction.
(b) When a person fails to comply with a cabinet subpoena, the Circuit Court of the county in which the
person is found, resides, or has his principal place of business may, upon application of the secretary,
his or her representative, or the party requesting the subpoena, issue an order requiring compliance. In
any proceeding brought under this section, the Circuit Court having issued the order of compliance may
modify or set aside the subpoena.
(c) Subpoenas issued under this section may be served by an authorized representative of the cabinet, at
any place in the state.
(3) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet may delegate any duties of the secretary's office to
employees of the cabinet as he or she deems necessary and appropriate, unless otherwise prohibited by statute.
(4) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet shall promulgate, administer, and enforce administrative
regulations that are necessary to implement programs mandated by federal law, qualify for the receipt of
federal funds, and cooperate with other state and federal agencies for the proper administration of the cabinet
and its programs, except for programs and federal funds within the authority of the Department of Education,
the Kentucky Board of Education, and the Education Professional Standards Board.
(5) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet shall have the duties, responsibilities, power, and authority
relating to labor, wages and hours, occupational safety and health of employees, child labor, workers'
compensation, and all other matters pertaining to Kentucky labor laws and the state's regulation of labor in the
Commonwealth.
(6) The secretary, in person or by representative, shall:
(a) Investigate and ascertain the wages of all employees employed in this state;
(b) Enter the place of business or employment of any employer of employees to examine and inspect all
books, registers, payrolls, and other records that have a bearing upon the question of wages of
employees and to ascertain compliance with the orders of the secretary; and
(c) Require from the employer a full and correct statement, in writing when the secretary or the secretary's
representative considers it necessary, of the wages paid to all employees of the employer.
(7) (a) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet, in person or by representative, may prosecute any
violation of any provision of any law which is his or her duty to administer or enforce.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) 1. The secretary may enter into reciprocal agreements with the corresponding labor agency or
official of any other state to collect in the other state claims assigned to the secretary.
2. To the extent allowed by a reciprocal agreement, the secretary may maintain actions in the courts
of another state to collect claims and judgments for wages and assign claims and judgments to
the agency or official of another state for collection.
3. If a reciprocal agreement extends a like comity to cases arising in the Commonwealth, the
secretary may maintain actions in the courts of the Commonwealth to collect claims and
judgments for wages arising in the other state in the same manner and to the same extent that
actions are authorized when arising in the Commonwealth.
(8) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet shall develop and promulgate administrative regulations that
protect the confidential nature of all records and reports of the Office of Unemployment Insurance, the Career
Development Office, and the Office of Industry[Employer] and Apprenticeship Services, which directly or
indirectly identify a client or former client and which ensure that these records are not disclosed to or by any
person, except if:
(a) The person identified gives his or her consent; or
(b) Disclosure may be permitted under state or federal law.
(9) Notwithstanding any other state statute or administrative regulation to the contrary, any information
concerning individual clients or applicants in the possession of the Department of Workforce Development
may be shared with any authorized representative of any other state or local governmental agency if the
agency has a direct, tangible, and legitimate interest in the individual. The agency receiving the information
shall ensure the confidentiality of all information received. The Department of Workforce Development may
share information concerning a client or applicant with any private or quasi-private agency if the agency has:
(a) An agreement with the cabinet ensuring the confidentiality of the information; and
(b) A direct, tangible, and legitimate interest in the individual.
(10) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet, with the approval of the Governor, shall appoint necessary
deputies, attorneys, statisticians, inspectors, and other employees and fix their salaries according to law. These
employees shall receive their actual necessary expenses.
Section 3. KRS 151B.185 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Office of Vocational Rehabilitation is hereby created within the Education and Labor Cabinet,
Department of Workforce Development. The office shall consist of an executive director and those
administrative bodies and employees provided or appointed pursuant to law. The office shall be composed of
the Division of Program Policy and Support, the Division of Kentucky Business Enterprise, the Division of
Blind Services, the Division of Field Services, and the Division of the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Training
Center. Each division shall be headed by a director appointed by the secretary of the Education and Labor
Cabinet under the provisions of KRS 12.050, and shall be composed of organizational entities as deemed
appropriate by the secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet.
(2) The Office of Vocational Rehabilitation shall have such powers and duties as contained in KRS 151B.180 to
151B.210 and KRS 163.450 to 163.480 and such other functions as may be established by administrative
regulation.
(3) The office shall be the sole state agency for the purpose of developing and approving state plans required by
state or federal laws and regulations as prerequisites to receiving federal funds for vocational rehabilitation.
(4) The chief executive officer of the office shall be the executive director of the Office of Vocational
Rehabilitation. The executive director shall be appointed by the secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet
under the provisions of KRS 12.050. The executive director shall have experience in vocational rehabilitation
and supervision and shall have general supervision and direction over all functions of the office and its
employees, and shall be responsible for carrying out the programs and policies of the office.
(5) Except as otherwise provided, the office shall be the state agency responsible for all rehabilitation services and
for other services as deemed necessary. The office shall be the agency authorized to expend all state and
federal funds designated for rehabilitation services. The Office of the Secretary of the Education and Labor
Cabinet is authorized as the state agency to receive all state and federal funds and gifts and bequests for the
benefit of rehabilitation services.

CHAPTER 29 5
(6) Employees under the jurisdiction of the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation who are members of a state
retirement system as of June 30, 1990, shall remain in their respective retirement systems.
Section 4. KRS 12.020 (Effective July 1, 2025) is amended to read as follows:
Departments, program cabinets and their departments, and the respective major administrative bodies that they
include are enumerated in this section. It is not intended that this enumeration of administrative bodies be all-
inclusive. Every authority, board, bureau, interstate compact, commission, committee, conference, council, office, or
any other form of organization shall be included in or attached to the department or program cabinet in which they
are included or to which they are attached by statute or statutorily authorized executive order; except in the case of
the Personnel Board and where the attached department or administrative body is headed by a constitutionally elected
officer, the attachment shall be solely for the purpose of dissemination of information and coordination of activities
and shall not include any authority over the functions, personnel, funds, equipment, facilities, or records of the
department or administrative body.
I. Cabinet for General Government - Departments headed by elected officers:
(1) The Governor.
(2) Lieutenant Governor.
(3) Department of State.
(a) Secretary of State.
(b) Board of Elections.
(c) Registry of Election Finance.
(4) Department of Law.
(a) Attorney General.
(5) Department of the Treasury.
(a) Treasurer.
(6) Department of Agriculture.
(a) Commissioner of Agriculture.
(b) Agricultural Development Board.
(c) Kentucky Agricultural Finance Corporation.
(7) Auditor of Public Accounts.
(a) Commonwealth Office of the Ombudsman.
II. Program cabinets headed by appointed officers:
(1) Justice and Public Safety Cabinet:
(a) Department of Kentucky State Police.
1. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Operational Support.
b. Division of Management Services.
2. Office of Operations.
a. Division of West Troops.
b. Division of East Troops.
c. Division of Special Enforcement.
d. Division of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement.
3. Office of Technical Services.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
a. Division of Forensic Sciences.
b. Division of Electronic Services.
c. Division of Records Management.
(b) Department of Criminal Justice Training.
(c) Department of Corrections.
(d) Department of Juvenile Justice.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
(f) Office of Drug Control Policy.
(g) Office of Legal Services.
(h) Office of the Kentucky State Medical Examiner.
(i) Parole Board.
(j) Kentucky State Corrections Commission.
(k) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services.
(l) Office of Human Resource Management.
1. Division of Human Resource Administration.
2. Division of Employee Management.
(m) Department of Public Advocacy.
(n) Office of Communications.
1. Information Technology Services Division.
(o) Office of Financial Management Services.
1. Division of Financial Management.
(p) Grants Management Division.
(2) Energy and Environment Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Legal Division I.
b. Legal Division II.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Communication.
5. Mine Safety Review Commission.
6. Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves.
7. Kentucky Public Service Commission.
(b) Department for Environmental Protection.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division for Air Quality.
3. Division of Water.
4. Division of Environmental Program Support.
5. Division of Waste Management.

CHAPTER 29 7
6. Division of Enforcement.
7. Division of Compliance Assistance.
(c) Department for Natural Resources.
1. Office of the Commissioner.
2. Division of Mine Permits.
3. Division of Mine Reclamation and Enforcement.
4. Division of Abandoned Mine Lands.
5. Division of Oil and Gas.
6. Division of Mine Safety.
7. Division of Forestry.
8. Division of Conservation.
9. Office of the Reclamation Guaranty Fund.
(d) Office of Energy Policy.
1. Division of Energy Assistance.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
1. Division of Human Resources Management.
2. Division of Financial Management.
3. Division of Information Services.
(3) Public Protection Cabinet.
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Communications and Public Outreach.
2. Office of Legal Services.
a. Insurance Legal Division.
b. Alcoholic Beverage Control Legal Division.
c. Housing, Buildings and Construction Legal Division.
d. Financial Institutions Legal Division.
e. Professional Licensing Legal Division.
3. Office of Administrative Hearings.
4. Office of Administrative Services.
a. Division of Human Resources.
b. Division of Fiscal Responsibility.
(b) Office of Claims and Appeals.
1. Board of Tax Appeals.
2. Board of Claims.
3. Crime Victims Compensation Board.
(c) Kentucky Boxing and Wrestling Commission.
(d) Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.
1. Division of Distilled Spirits.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Division of Malt Beverages.
3. Division of Enforcement.
(e) Department of Financial Institutions.
1. Division of Depository Institutions.
2. Division of Non-Depository Institutions.
3. Division of Securities.
(f) Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.
1. Division of Fire Prevention.
2. Division of Plumbing.
3. Division of Heating, Ventilation, and Air Conditioning.
4. Division of Building Code Enforcement.
(g) Department of Insurance.
1. Division of Health and Life Insurance and Managed Care.
2. Division of Property and Casualty Insurance.
3. Division of Administrative Services.
4. Division of Financial Standards and Examination.
5. Division of Licensing.
6. Division of Insurance Fraud Investigation.
7. Division of Consumer Protection.
(h) Department of Professional Licensing.
1. Real Estate Authority.
2. Division of Real Property Boards.
(4) Transportation Cabinet:
(a) Department of Highways.
1. Office of Project Development.
2. Office of Project Delivery and Preservation.
3. Office of Highway Safety.
4. Highway District Offices One through Twelve.
(b) Department of Vehicle Regulation.
(c) Department of Aviation.
(d) Department of Rural and Municipal Aid.
1. Office of Local Programs.
2. Office of Rural and Secondary Roads.
(e) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office for Civil Rights and Small Business Development.
3. Office of Budget and Fiscal Management.
4. Office of Inspector General.
5. Secretary's Office of Safety.

CHAPTER 29 9
(f) Office of Support Services.
(g) Office of Transportation Delivery.
(h) Office of Audits.
(i) Office of Human Resource Management.
(j) Office of Information Technology.
(k) Office of Legal Services.
(5) Cabinet for Economic Development:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
2. Department for Business and Community Development.
a. Development and Retention Division – West Kentucky.
b. Development, Retention, and Administrative Division – Central and East
Kentucky.
c. Community and Workforce Development Division.
3. Department for Financial Services.
a. Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority.
b. Finance and Personnel Division.
c. IT and Resource Management Division.
d. Compliance Division.
e. Program Administration Division.
f. Bluegrass State Skills Corporation.
g. The GRANT Commission.
4. Office of Strategy and Public Affairs.
a. Marketing and Communications Division.
b. Research and Strategy Division.
5. Office of Entrepreneurship and Innovation.
a. Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy.
(6) Cabinet for Health and Family Services:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Public Affairs.
2. Office of Legal Services.
3. Office of Inspector General.
4. Office of Human Resource Management.
5. Office of Finance and Budget.
6. Office of Legislative and Regulatory Affairs.
7. Office of Administrative Services.
8. Office of Application Technology Services.
9. Office of Data Analytics.
10. Office of Medical Cannabis.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
a. Division of Enforcement and Compliance.
b. Division of Licensure and Access.
(b) Department for Public Health.
(c) Department for Medicaid Services.
(d) Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities.
(e) Department for Aging and Independent Living.
(f) Department for Community Based Services.
(g) Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services.
(7) Finance and Administration Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Office of the Inspector General.
(c) Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Affairs.
(d) Office of General Counsel.
(e) Office of the Controller.
(f) Office of Administrative Services.
(g) Office of Policy and Audit.
(h) Department for Facilities and Support Services.
(i) Department of Revenue.
(j) Commonwealth Office of Technology.
(k) State Property and Buildings Commission.
(l) Office of Equal Employment Opportunity and Contract Compliance.
(m) Kentucky Employees Retirement Systems.
(n) Commonwealth Credit Union.
(o) State Investment Commission.
(p) Kentucky Housing Corporation.
(q) Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority.
(r) Kentucky Turnpike Authority.
(s) Historic Properties Advisory Commission.
(t) Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority.
(u) Kentucky River Authority.
(v) Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System Board of Trustees.
(w) Executive Branch Ethics Commission.
(x) Office of Fleet Management.
(8) Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet:
(a) Kentucky Department of Tourism.
1. Division of Tourism Services.
2. Division of Marketing and Administration.
3. Division of Communications and Promotions.
(b) Kentucky Department of Parks.

CHAPTER 29 11
1. Division of Information Technology.
2. Division of Human Resources.
3. Division of Financial Operations.
4. Division of Purchasing.
5. Division of Facilities.
6. Division of Park Operations.
7. Division of Sales, Marketing, and Customer Service.
8. Division of Engagement.
9. Division of Food Services.
10. Division of Rangers.
(c) Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.
1. Division of Law Enforcement.
2. Division of Administrative Services.
3. Division of Engineering, Infrastructure, and Technology.
4. Division of Fisheries.
5. Division of Information and Education.
6. Division of Wildlife.
7. Division of Marketing.
(d) Kentucky Horse Park.
1. Division of Support Services.
2. Division of Buildings and Grounds.
3. Division of Operational Services.
(e) Kentucky State Fair Board.
1. Office of Administrative and Information Technology Services.
2. Office of Human Resources and Access Control.
3. Division of Expositions.
4. Division of Kentucky Exposition Center Operations.
5. Division of Kentucky International Convention Center.
6. Division of Public Relations and Media.
7. Division of Venue Services.
8. Division of Personnel Management and Staff Development.
9. Division of Sales.
10. Division of Security and Traffic Control.
11. Division of Information Technology.
12. Division of the Louisville Arena.
13. Division of Fiscal and Contract Management.
14. Division of Access Control.
(f) Office of the Secretary.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. Office of Finance.
2. Office of Government Relations and Administration.
(g) Office of Legal Affairs.
(h) Office of Human Resources.
(i) Office of Public Affairs and Constituent Services.
(j) Office of Arts and Cultural Heritage.
(k) Kentucky African-American Heritage Commission.
(l) Kentucky Foundation for the Arts.
(m) Kentucky Humanities Council.
(n) Kentucky Heritage Council.
(o) Kentucky Arts Council.
(p) Kentucky Historical Society.
1. Division of Museums.
2. Division of Oral History and Educational Outreach.
3. Division of Research and Publications.
4. Division of Administration.
(q) Kentucky Center for the Arts.
1. Division of Governor's School for the Arts.
(r) Kentucky Artisans Center at Berea.
(s) Northern Kentucky Convention Center.
(t) Eastern Kentucky Exposition Center.
(9) Personnel Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
(b) Department of Human Resources Administration.
(c) Office of Employee Relations.
(d) Kentucky Public Employees Deferred Compensation Authority.
(e) Office of Administrative Services.
(f) Office of Legal Services.
(g) Governmental Services Center.
(h) Department of Employee Insurance.
(i) Office of Diversity, Equality, and Training.
(j) Office of Public Affairs.
(10) Education and Labor Cabinet:
(a) Office of the Secretary.
1. Office of Legal Services.
a. Workplace Standards Legal Division.
b. Workers' Claims Legal Division.
c. Workforce Development Legal Division.
2. Office of Administrative Services.

CHAPTER 29 13
a. Division of Human Resources Management.
b. Division of Fiscal Management.
c. Division of Operations and Support Services.
3. Office of Technology Services.
a. Division of Information Technology Services.
4. Office of Policy and Audit.
5. Office of Legislative Services.
6. Office of Communications.
7. Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
8. Board of the Kentucky Center for Statistics.
9. Early Childhood Advisory Council.
10. Governors' Scholars Program.
11. Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program.
12. Foundation for Adult Education.
(b) Department of Education.
1. Kentucky Board of Education.
2. Kentucky Technical Education Personnel Board.
3. Education Professional Standards Board.
(c) Board of Directors for the Center for School Safety.
(d) Department for Libraries and Archives.
(e) Kentucky Environmental Education Council.
(f) Kentucky Educational Television.
(g) Kentucky Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
(h) Department of Workforce Development.
1. Career Development Office.
2. Office of Vocational Rehabilitation.
a. Division of Kentucky Business Enterprise.
b. Division of the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Training Center.
c. Division of Blind Services.
d. Division of Field Services.
e. Statewide Council for Vocational Rehabilitation.
f. Employment First Council.
g. Division of Program Policy and Support.
3. Office of Industry[Employer] and Apprenticeship Services.
a. Division of Apprenticeship.
b. Division of Workforce Talent.
4. Kentucky Apprenticeship Council.
5. Division of Technical Assistance.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
6. Office of Adult Education.
7. Office of the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(i) Department of Workplace Standards.
1. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Compliance.
2. Division of Occupational Safety and Health Education and Training.
3. Division of Wages and Hours.
(j) Office of Unemployment Insurance.
(k) Kentucky Unemployment Insurance Commission.
(l) Department of Workers' Claims.
1. Division of Workers' Compensation Funds.
2. Office of Administrative Law Judges.
3. Division of Claims Processing.
4. Division of Security and Compliance.
5. Division of Specialist and Medical Services.
6. Workers' Compensation Board.
(m) Workers' Compensation Funding Commission.
(n) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Standards Board.
(o) State Labor Relations Board.
(p) Employers' Mutual Insurance Authority.
(q) Kentucky Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission.
(r) Workers' Compensation Nominating Committee.
(s) Office of Educational Programs.
(t) Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board.
(u) Kentucky Commission on Proprietary Education.
(v) Kentucky Work Ready Skills Advisory Committee.
(w) Kentucky Geographic Education Board.
(x) Department for Disability Determination Services[ Program].
1. Division of Operations.
2. Division of Support Services.
3. Division of Specialized Cases.
4. Division of Case Processing.
III. Other departments headed by appointed officers:
(1) Council on Postsecondary Education.
(2) Department of Military Affairs.
(3) Department for Local Government.
(4) Kentucky Commission on Human Rights.
(5) Kentucky Commission on Women.
(6) Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(7) Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs.

CHAPTER 29 15
(8) Office of Minority Empowerment.
(9) Governor's Council on Wellness and Physical Activity.
(10) Kentucky Communications Network Authority.
Section 5. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025.
Signed by Governor March 18, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version